Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
FUNDING - FLOATING DEBT

31-21-101. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Floating indebtedness" means all obligations of the municipality to pay money, of whatever kind or character, except indebtedness evidenced by outstanding negotiable interest-bearing bonds of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1134, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-102. Funding bonds - determination of indebtedness.

The governing body of any municipality may issue negotiable coupon bonds, to be denominated funding bonds, for the purpose of funding any of the legal floating indebtedness of such municipality existing at any time. The specific indebtedness to be funded and the amount of such funding bonds to be issued under the provisions of this part 1 shall first be determined by such governing body and a certificate of such determination shall be made and entered in the records of the municipality prior to the issuance of said funding bonds. Nothing in this part 1 shall be construed to repeal or amend any law limiting the indebtedness of municipalities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1134, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-103. Bond election - judgments.

Whenever such governing body deems it expedient to issue funding bonds under the provisions of this part 1, it shall direct, by ordinance, that the question be submitted at a regular election in the manner provided for authorization of other bonded indebtedness in section 31-15-302 (1)(d). At any election held under the provisions of this part 1, the question of authorizing the funding of all or any part of the floating indebtedness of the city or town may be submitted as one question for determination, irrespective of the form or date of such indebtedness. The election shall be conducted as nearly as possible in conformity with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". The election notice shall specify, in addition to the time and places for holding said election, the qualifications for persons to vote on such question, the amount of the indebtedness to be funded, and the amount of funding bonds proposed to be issued and the rate of interest they shall bear. At such election the ballots or voting machine tabs shall contain the words "For the Funding Bonds" and "Against the Funding Bonds".

No election shall be necessary to authorize the governing body to issue bonds for the purpose of funding indebtedness in the form of a valid subsisting judgment against the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1134, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-21-104. Ordinance - form and maturity of bonds.

If the governing body determines to issue funding bonds for the purpose of paying and discharging any valid and subsisting judgment against the municipality or if, upon canvassing the vote cast at any election held under the provisions of this part 1, it is determined by the governing body that a majority of the votes cast upon the question submitted are for funding, the governing body shall make such determination a part of the official records of the municipality, and the governing body shall immediately thereafter adopt and make a law of the municipality an ordinance which shall not be subject to the referendum provisions of any law providing for the issue of said funding bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part 1. Such ordinance shall fix the date of said funding bonds, shall designate the denominations thereof, the rate of interest, the maturity date which shall not be more than twenty-five years from the date of said funding bonds, the place of payment, within or without the state of Colorado, of both principal and interest, and shall prescribe the form of said funding bonds.

Such funding bonds shall be negotiable in form, shall recite the title of the act under which they are issued, and shall be executed in the name of the municipality, signed by the mayor, countersigned by the treasurer, with the seal of the municipality affixed thereto, and attested by the clerk. The interest accruing on such funding bonds shall be evidenced by interest coupons attached bearing the engraved facsimile signature of the treasurer of the municipality. When so executed, such coupons shall be the binding obligations of the municipality according to their import. In the adoption of said ordinance providing for the issue of such funding bonds, the governing body shall make the principal of the debt payable in substantially equal annual installments during the period, not exceeding twenty-five years, within which the debt is to be discharged. The date of the maturity of the first installment of the debt shall not be more than five years from the date of said funding bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1134, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-105. Disposition of bonds.

All such funding bonds may be exchanged, dollar for dollar, in satisfaction of the indebtedness to be funded, or they may be sold at not less than their par value, as directed by the governing body, and the proceeds thereof shall be applied only to the purpose for which such funding bonds were issued.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1135, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-106. Taxes for interest and redemption.

The interest accruing on such funding bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 1 prior to the time when tax levies are available therefor shall be paid out of the general revenues of the municipality. For the purpose of reimbursing such general revenues and for the payment of subsequently accruing interest, the governing body issuing such funding bonds or the proper tax assessing and collecting officers upon whom shall devolve the duty of levying and collecting municipal taxes shall levy annually a sufficient tax upon all of the taxable property in the municipality fully to discharge such interest. For the ultimate redemption of such funding bonds, there shall be levied annually such a tax upon all the taxable property in such municipality as will create a fund sufficient to discharge each annual installment of such funding bonds at the maturity thereof, which fund shall be called the redemption fund. All taxes for interest on and for the redemption of such bonds shall be paid in cash only and shall be kept by the municipal treasurer as a special fund to be used only in payment of the interest upon and for the redemption of such bonds. Such tax shall be levied and collected as other municipal taxes are levied and collected. The tax provisions for the ultimate redemption of such bonds shall be set forth in the ordinance authorizing their issue and shall set forth the years in which such taxes shall be levied for the creation of said redemption fund.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1135, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-107. Ordinance irrepealable.

Any ordinance authorizing an issue of funding bonds under the provisions of this part 1 and providing for the levy of taxes for the payment of the interest upon the principal of such funding bonds shall not be altered or repealed until the indebtedness thereby authorized has been fully paid.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1135, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-107 as it existed prior to 1975.